Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Meetings

Law reviews

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

§ 17-16-701.
Annual meeting.

Unless directors are elected by written consent in lieu of an annual meeting as permitted by W.S.

17-16-704

, a corporation shall hold a meeting of shareholders annually at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

Annual shareholders’ meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office. The board of directors may, in its sole discretion, determine that the meeting shall not be held at any place, but may instead be held by means of remote communication. The board shall take into consideration stockholders’ ability to participate by remote communication and provide an alternative means of participation for those stockholders unable to participate by remote communication. If authorized by the board of directors in its sole discretion, and subject to guidelines and procedures the board of directors may adopt, stockholders and proxies not physically present at a meeting of stockholders may, by means of remote communication:

Participate in a meeting of stockholders; and

Be deemed present in person and vote at a meeting of stockholders, whether the meeting is held at a designated place or solely by means of remote communication, provided that the corporation shall implement reasonable measures to verify that each person deemed present and permitted to vote at the meeting by means of remote communication is a stockholder or proxy. The corporations shall implement reasonable measures to provide the stockholders and proxies a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the stockholders, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with the proceeding. If any stockholder or proxy votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of remote communication, a record of the vote or other action shall be maintained by the corporation.

The failure to hold an annual meeting at the time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation’s bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2005, ch. 51, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), added the provisions for remote participation in meetings, beginning with the third sentence and including (b)(i) and (b)(ii).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “Unless directors are elected by written consent in lieu of an annual meeting as permitted by W.S.

17-16-704

” in (a).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The New Wyoming Statutory Close Corporation Supplement; Should Your Corporation Elect Statutory Close Corporation Status?,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 589 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Remedies to restrain or compel holding of stockholders' meetings, 48 ALR2d 615.

§ 17-16-702.
Special meeting.

A corporation shall hold a special meeting of shareholders:

On call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized to do so by the articles of incorporation or bylaws; or

If the holders of at least ten percent (10%) of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting sign, date, and deliver to the corporation one (1) or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held, provided that the articles of incorporation may fix a lower percentage or a higher percentage not exceeding twenty-five percent (25%) of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered. Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a written demand for a special meeting may be revoked by a writing to that effect received by the corporation prior to the receipt by the corporation of demands sufficient in number to require the holding of a special meeting.

If not otherwise fixed under W.S.

17-16-703

or

17-16-707

, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand a special meeting is the date the first shareholder signs the demand.

Special shareholders’ meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by W.S. 17-16-705(c) may be conducted at a special shareholders’ meeting.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “either manually or in facsimile” after “special meeting sign” in the first sentence of (a)(ii).

§ 17-16-703.
Court-ordered meeting.

The district court of the county where a corporation’s principal office or, if none in this state, its registered office is located may summarily order a meeting to be held:

On application of any shareholder of the corporation entitled to participate in an annual meeting if an annual meeting was not held or action by written consent in lieu thereof did not become effective within the earlier of six (6) months after the end of the corporation’s fiscal year or fifteen (15) months after its last annual meeting; or

On application of a shareholder who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under W.S.

17-16-702

, if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within thirty (30) days after the date the demand was delivered to the corporation’s secretary; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, determine the shares entitled to participate in the meeting, specify a record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters, and enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “or action by written consent in lieu thereof did not become effective” in (a)(i); and substituted “thirty (30) days” for “sixty (60) days” in (a)(ii)(A).

§ 17-16-704.
Action without meeting.

Action required or permitted by this act to be taken at a shareholders’ meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all the shareholders entitled to vote on the action. The action shall be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents bearing the date of signature and describing the action taken, signed by the holders of the requisite number of shares entitled to vote on the action, and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

The articles of incorporation may provide that any action required or permitted by this act to be taken at a shareholders’ meeting may be taken without a meeting, and without prior notice, if consents in writing setting forth the action so taken are signed by the holders of outstanding shares having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be required to authorize or take the action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote on the action were present and voted. The written consent shall bear the date of signature of the shareholder who signs the consent and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

If not otherwise fixed under W.S.

17-16-703

or

17-16-707

, and if prior board action is not required respecting the action to be taken without a meeting, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to take action without a meeting shall be the first date on which a signed written consent is delivered to the corporation. If not otherwise fixed under W.S.

17-16-707

and if prior board action is required respecting the action to be taken without a meeting, the record date shall be the close of business on the day the resolution of the board taking such prior action is adopted. No written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless, within sixty (60) days of the earliest date on which a consent delivered to the corporation as required by this section was signed, written consents signed by sufficient shareholders to take the action have been delivered to the corporation. A written consent may be revoked by a writing to that effect delivered to the corporation before unrevoked written consents sufficient in number to take corporate action are delivered to the corporation.

A consent signed pursuant to the provisions of this section has the effect of a vote taken at a meeting and may be described as such in any document. Unless the articles of incorporation, bylaws or a resolution of the board of directors provides for a reasonable delay to permit tabulation of written consents, the action taken by written consent shall be effective when written consents signed by sufficient shareholders to take the action are delivered to the corporation.

If this act requires that notice of proposed action be given to nonvoting shareholders and the action is to be taken by written consent of the voting shareholders, the corporation shall give its nonvoting shareholders written notice of the action not more than ten (10) days after written consents sufficient to take the action have been delivered to the corporation or the later date that tabulation of consents is completed pursuant to the authorization under subsection (d) of this section. The notice shall reasonably describe the action taken and contain or be accompanied by the same material that, under any provision of this act, would have been required to be sent to nonvoting shareholders in a notice of meeting at which the proposed action would have been submitted to the shareholders for action.

If action is taken by less than unanimous written consent of the voting shareholders, the corporation shall give its nonconsenting voting shareholders written notice of the action not more than ten (10) days after written consents sufficient to take the action have been delivered to the corporation, or the later date that tabulation of consents is completed pursuant to an authorization under subsection (d) of this section. The notice shall reasonably describe the action taken and contain or be accompanied by the same material that, under any provision of this act, would have been required to be sent to voting shareholders in a notice of a meeting at which the action would have been submitted to the shareholders for action.

The notice requirements in subsections (e) and (f) of this section shall not delay the effectiveness of actions taken by written consent, and a failure to comply with such notice requirements shall not invalidate actions taken by written consent, provided that this subsection shall not be deemed to limit judicial power to fashion any appropriate remedy in favor of a shareholder adversely affected by a failure to give the notice within the required time period.

An electronic transmission may be used to consent to an action, if the electronic transmission contains or is accompanied by information from which the corporation can determine the date on which the electronic transmission was signed and that the electronic transmission was authorized by the shareholder, the shareholder’s agent or the shareholder’s attorney-in-fact.

Delivery of a written consent to the corporation under this section is delivery to the corporation’s registered agent at its registered office or to the secretary of the corporation at its principal office.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2; 2005, ch. 51, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), inserted “by electronic transmittal” before “or in facsimile.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), substituted “if the action is taken by all the shareholders” for “if notice of the proposed action is given to all voting shareholders and the action is taken by the holders of all shares” in the first sentence, and deleted “either manually, by electronic transmittal or in facsimile” after “action taken, signed” in the last sentence; added (b); rewrote (c) through (e) to expand consideration of written consents; added (f) through (i); and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-705.
Notice of meeting.

A corporation shall notify shareholders of the date, time, place and means of communication of each annual and special shareholders’ meeting no fewer than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days before the meeting date. Unless this act or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, the corporation is required to give notice only to shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting.

Unless this act or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, notice of an annual meeting need not include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

Notice of a special meeting shall include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

If not otherwise fixed under W.S.

17-16-703

or

17-16-707

, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at an annual or special shareholders’ meeting is the day before the first notice is delivered to shareholders.

Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an annual or special shareholders’ meeting is adjourned to a different date, time, place or means of communication, notice need not be given of the new date, time, place or means of communication if the new date, time place or means of communication is announced at the meeting before adjournment. If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or shall be fixed under W.S.

17-16-707

, however, notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given under this section to persons who are shareholders as of the new record date.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2005, ch. 51, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “means of communication” or a variant after “place” throughout (a) and (e), and made related changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Participation in meeting as waiver of compliance with notice requirement for shareholders' meeting, 64 ALR3d 358.

§ 17-16-706.
Waiver of notice.

A shareholder may waive any notice required by this act, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver shall be in writing, be signed or shall be sent by electronic transmission by the shareholder entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

A shareholder’s attendance at a meeting:

Waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting; and

Waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2005, ch. 51, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), inserted “or shall be sent by electronic transmission” after “facsimile.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “either manually or in facsimile” after “writing, be signed” in the last sentence of (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Participation in meeting as waiver of notice requirement for shareholders' meeting, 64 ALR3d 358.

§ 17-16-707.
Record date.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing the record date for one (1) or more voting groups in order to determine the shareholders entitled to notice of a shareholders’ meeting, to demand a special meeting, to vote, or to take any other action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board of directors of the corporation may fix a future date as the record date.

A record date fixed under this section may not be more than seventy (70) days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of shareholders.

A determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a shareholders’ meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board of directors fixes a new record date, which it shall do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date fixed for the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date continues in effect or it may fix a new record date.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

§ 17-16-708.
Conduct of the meeting.

At each meeting of shareholders, a chair shall preside. The chair shall be appointed as provided in the bylaws or, in the absence of such provision, by the board.

The chair, unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, shall determine the order of business and shall have the authority to establish rules for the conduct of the meeting.

Any rules adopted for, and the conduct of, the meeting shall be fair to shareholders.

The chair of the meeting shall announce at the meeting when the polls close for each matter voted upon. If no announcement is made, the polls shall be deemed to have closed upon the final adjournment of the meeting. After the polls close, no ballots, proxies or votes nor any revocations or changes thereto may be accepted.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “have the authority to” in (b).